Louisiana, session 2026, HB1207.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 38:2212.11 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2212.11. Competitive bidding; limitations on experience requirements; alternate
qualifications
A.(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a public entity
shall not require a contractor or subcontractor to provide proof of experience or
qualifications in performing public works that are unduly restrictive of competition
or that are tailored to a specific product, manufacturer, system, or prior project.
(2) No public entity shall require, as a condition of bidding or award, that a
contractor or subcontractor demonstrate prior experience installing a specific
proprietary material, product, or system.
B. Any experience or qualification requirement imposed by a public entity
shall:
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1742 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1207
(1) Be reasonably related to the scope and complexity of the project.
(2) Not be used to unduly limit the pool of qualified bidders.
(3) Be documented in writing, including a justification demonstrating the
necessity of such requirement for public safety or project performance.
C. A public entity shall provide an alternate method for a contractor or
subcontractor to demonstrate competency and qualify for bidding, including but not
limited to:
(1) Manufacturer or supplier certification.
(2) Successful completion of relevant training programs.
(3) Demonstration of comparable project experience.
(4) Submission of a project-specific installation or performance plan.
(5) Any other reasonable method that demonstrates the ability to perform the
work in accordance with the project specifications.
D. No bidder shall be disqualified solely for lack of prior experience with a
specific proprietary product, material, or system if the bidder satisfies an alternate
qualification method provided pursuant to this Section.
Section 2. R.S. 48:251(E) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§251. Contracts for projects
* * *
E.(1) The Department of Transportation and Development shall not require
a contractor or subcontractor to provide proof of experience or qualifications in
performing public works that are unduly restrictive of competition or tailored to a
specific product, manufacturer, system, or prior project.
(2) The department shall not require prior installation or use of a specific
proprietary material, product, or system as a condition for bidding or award.
(3) The department shall ensure that all experience or qualification
requirements are reasonably related to the project and shall not be used to limit
competition.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1742 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1207
(4) The department shall provide an alternate method for contractors to
demonstrate competency and qualify for bidding, consistent with the provisions of
R.S. 38:2212.11.